California statutes. Education Code
(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person shall not be denied a temporary certificate or a temporary certificate of clearance solely on the basis that the person has been convicted of a serious felony that is not also a violent felony, if that person can prove to the sentencing court of the offense in question, by clear and convincing evidence, that he or she has been rehabilitated for the purposes of school employment for at least one year. If the offense in question occurred outside this state, then the person may seek a finding of rehabilitation from the court in the school district in which he or she is a resident.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), a
 county board of education or city and county board of education may issue a temporary certificate to an employee currently and continuously employed by a school district within the county who is serving under a valid credential and has applied for a renewal of that credential or for an additional credential without obtaining a certificate of clearance from the commission for that employee.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), a county board of education or city and county board of education may issue a temporary certificate of clearance to an employee currently and continuously employed by a school district within the county who is serving under a valid credential and has applied for a renewal of that credential or for an additional credential without obtaining a certificate of clearance from the commission for that
 employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 199, Sec. 4.   (AB 681)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

44333.

The standard for the exchange credential shall be as prescribed by the commission pursuant to Section 44853.

This credential shall authorize service in a position requiring certification qualifications as an exchange certified employee for performance of the services specified in the credential. Services for which a license is required by the Business and Professions Code may not be authorized unless the applicant holds such a license.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44334.

Except as provided in this code, no certification document shall be granted to any person unless and until he has subscribed to the following oath or affirmation: “I solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support the Constitution of the United States of America, the Constitution of the State of California, and the laws of the United States and the State of California.” The oath or affirmation shall be subscribed and certified or declared, pursuant to Section 2015. 5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and shall be filed with the commission. Any certificated person who is a citizen or subject of any country other than the United States, and who is employed in any capacity in any of the public schools of the state shall, before entering upon the discharge of his duties, subscribe to an oath to support the institutions and policies of the United States during the period of his sojourn within the state. Upon the violation of any of the terms of the oath or affirmation, the commission shall suspend or revoke the credential which has been issued.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44335.

The issuance of any teaching credential requires (1) the passing of a satisfactory examination on the provisions and principles of the Constitution of the United States in a community college, college, or university of recognized merit or (2) the satisfactory completion of two semester units of work on the provisions and principles of the Constitution of the United States in any university or college from which undergraduate credits earned are accepted by the commission as meeting undergraduate credit requirements for credentials issued by the commission or in any publicly supported community college in the state. Public and private institutions in California may be authorized to attest to the individual’s satisfaction of this requirement.

The requirements of this section do not apply to the designated subjects teaching credential authorizing part-time employment only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

44336.

When required by the commission, the application for a certification document or the renewal thereof shall be accompanied by a certificate in such form as shall be prescribed by the commission, from a physician and surgeon licensed under the provisions of the Business and Professions Code or a physician assistant practicing in compliance with Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, showing that the applicant is free from any contagious and communicable disease or other disabling disease or defect unfitting the applicant to instruct or associate with children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 512, Sec. 4.   (SB 1069)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

44337.

No person otherwise qualified shall be denied the right to receive credentials from the commission, to receive training for the purpose of becoming a teacher, or to engage in practice teaching in any school, on the grounds he or she is an individual with a disability; nor shall any school district refuse to engage a teacher on such grounds, provided, that the teacher, with reasonable accommodations, is able to carry out the duties of the position for which he or she applies in the school district. “Disability,” as used in this section, means (1) a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more of the major life activities of the individual, (2) a record of such an impairment, or (3) being regarded as having such an impairment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 913, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

44338.

No person otherwise qualified shall be denied the right to receive credentials issued by the commission, to receive training for the purpose of becoming a teacher, or to engage in practice teaching in any school, on the ground he or she is a person with a disability; provided, that the person does not pose a direct threat of substantial harm to the health or safety of other individuals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 913, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

44339.

(a) The commission shall adopt, in addition to any other regulations authorized by law, regulations requiring every applicant for a credential, or for the renewal of a credential, to submit reasonable evidence of identification and good moral character.

(b) The adopted rules and regulations shall specify that an applicant shall not be required to disclose, and the Committee of Credentials shall not inquire into or consider, any acts or omissions not related to the applicant’s fitness to teach or perform other duties for which he or she is certificated, or which is related to his or her competence to perform the duties authorized by his or her credential.

(c) The adopted rules and regulations shall also prescribe the notice which shall be supplied to each applicant on the application form, which shall include the following information:

(1) The offenses which constitute grounds for the mandatory denial or revocation of a credential.

(2) The offenses for which the commission is authorized to deny or revoke a credential, depending upon the degree of rehabilitation or requalification demonstrated by the applicant.

(3) The standards under which the commission determines that it shall not investigate or pursue offenses which are not clearly related to an applicant’s fitness or competence to teach or perform other certificated services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 996, Sec. 4.   Effective September 14, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

44339.5.

(a) The commission, by July 1, 2019, shall authorize the use of an individual tax identification number in lieu of a social security number for purposes of applying for a credential, or the renewal of a credential, when an applicant cannot provide his or her social security number.

(b) An applicant shall not be required to disclose citizenship status or immigration status for purposes of the application or renewal of a credential.

(c) An applicant shall not be denied a credential based solely on his or her citizenship status or immigration status if otherwise qualified and eligible for the credential.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 838, Sec. 4.   (SB 695)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

44340.

Each applicant for a credential, or for the renewal of a credential, shall submit with his application duplicate personal identification cards provided by the commission upon which shall appear the legible fingerprints and a personal description of the applicant.

The commission is authorized to, and shall adopt such regulations as may in its judgment be necessary for the administration of this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44341.

(a) (1) For the purpose of ascertaining the moral character and true identity of the holder of a credential or an applicant for a credential or the renewal of a credential after jurisdiction to commence an initial review pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 44242.5 has been established, the commission is authorized to require the production of information, records, reports, and other data from any public agency. For the purposes of determining whether jurisdiction exists, the commission is also authorized to require the limited production of records as set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 44242.5.

(2) This information shall be provided to the commission within 30 days of the request.

(3) The commission shall maintain the confidentiality of this information in accordance with Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of the Civil Code.

(b) Except for the situation prescribed in subdivision (d), every applicant for a credential or for the renewal of a credential shall be deemed to have given his or her consent for the securing of, and disclosure of, information to the commission for the sole purpose of ascertaining the moral character and true identity of the holder of a credential, the applicant for a credential, or a credential holder applying for the renewal of the credential.

(c) The Department of Justice shall furnish, upon application of the commission or its authorized representative, all information pertaining to any applicant of whom there is a record in its office except that information which may compromise or prejudice an ongoing criminal investigative matter may be withheld until the matter is completed.

(d) With the written consent of an applicant for a credential or a credential holder, the commission upon written request of any private school authority, shall release to that private school authority information and other data relative to the identification or fitness of any applicant for a teaching position in the private school so long as not otherwise prohibited by any other provision of law.

(e) Each application for a credential shall contain notice that the information provided by the applicant is subject to investigation for, and verification of, the applicant’s moral character and true identity by means of review of information, records, reports, and other data from any agency or department of the state or any political subdivision of the state, whether chartered by the state or not, secured by the commission for these purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 342, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

44342.

Teachers, principals, supervisors, school librarians, superintendents and assistant superintendents, and other certified personnel who are presently employed in public schools in California shall not be adversely affected by this chapter. However, presently employed personnel and those in preparation shall be permitted to seek initial or renewal certification under the terms of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44343.

A credential which was issued prior to July 1, 1973, shall remain in force as long as it is valid and continues to be valid under the law and regulations of the commission. The commission may not by regulation invalidate such valid credential unless it issues to the holder thereof, in substitution, a new credential authorized by other sections of this chapter which is no less restrictive than the credential for which it was substituted with respect to the kind of service which it authorizes, and the grades or classes of types of schools in which it authorizes services.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44343.4.

(a) The commission shall issue a comparable credential at the preliminary level to an eligible applicant for the purpose of providing instruction or services in public schools if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The eligible applicant possesses and provides proof of a valid, out-of-state, unexpired, professional-level teaching or services credential.

(2) The eligible applicant provides evidence that the eligible applicant is, is married to, or is in a domestic partnership or other legal union with, an active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States.

(3) The eligible applicant provides either
 of the following:

(A) A copy of their, or their spouse or domestic partner’s, official military orders for reassignment to California.

(B) Evidence of their spouse or domestic partner’s death while serving as an active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States in the previous 12 months.

(4) The eligible applicant satisfies the fingerprinting requirement for purposes of conducting a criminal background check and satisfies the professional fitness requirement pursuant to Sections 44339, 44340, and 44341.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a credential issued pursuant to this section shall be valid only for the duration of the military orders pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(2) A credential issued to eligible applicants who provided evidence pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall be valid for no more than three years. A credential issued pursuant to this paragraph may only be issued once.

(c) An eligible applicant licensed under this section may subsequently apply for full licensure in California based on existing pathways for out-of-state prepared educators.

(d) The commission shall issue a credential under this section to a spouse of a United States military service member consistent with subdivision (a) of Section 44343.5.

(e) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Active duty member of the
 Armed Forces of the United States” means any person serving in a full-time duty status in the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Space Force, or Coast Guard, including members of any reserve component of those forces and members of the National Guard.

(2) “Eligible applicant” means any United States military service member or their spouse or domestic partner, or a surviving spouse or domestic partner of a service member who died while serving as an active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States in the previous 12 months.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 33.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

44343.5.

(a) The commission shall grant or deny a completed application for a credential within seven days of the date that the commission received the application if the applicant does both of the following:

(1) Supplies the commission with evidence that the applicant is married to, or in a domestic partnership or other legal union with, an active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States who is assigned to a duty station in this state under official active duty military orders.

(2) Holds a valid teaching credential in another state, district, or territory of the United States.

(b) The seven-day processing time set forth in this section shall not apply to an application subject to a fitness review by the commission pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 44240).

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 436, Sec. 1.   (AB 226)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

44344.

(a) The commission shall issue the appropriate credentials authorized by the law operative, and the rules and regulations of the commission in effect on December 31, 1971, to any person who completed the requirements for such credential before September 15, 1974.

(b) A person may be issued a credential under this section after September 15, 1974, if that person, between December 31, 1971, and September 15, 1974:

(1) Was engaged in teaching in a foreign country, after such person had completed the requirements of such credential.

(2) Holds a credential issued under partial fulfillment and was
 working towards meeting the requirements of that credential and was enrolled in a teacher training institution.

(3) Was working towards meeting the requirements of such credential and was prevented from completing those requirements because of active military service, illness, or other causes determined by the commission.

(4) Was accepted into and enrolled in a teacher education curriculum at any institution and would be required to take more than 15 semester-hour units or the equivalent quarter-hour units after September 15, 1974, beyond the requirements necessary to receive such credential, in order to meet the requirements of credentials issued under this chapter.

(5) Was enrolled in a student-declared degree program at a regionally accredited institution of higher education leading to such credential with at
 least a junior standing as determined by the institution and would be required to take more than 15 semester-hour units or the equivalent quarter-hour units after September 15, 1974, beyond the requirements necessary to receive such credential, in order to meet the requirements of credentials issued under this chapter.

(c) No credential authorized under this law and rules and regulations in effect on December 31, 1971, shall be issued to any person pursuant to the exceptions specified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) after September 15, 1976.

(d) For purposes of this section, “teacher education curriculum” means any professional education course or sequence of professional education courses required for a credential authorized by the law operative, and the rules and regulations of the commission in effect on December 31, 1971.

(e) For purposes of this section, “student-declared degree program” means any student-elected degree objective at a regionally accredited institution of higher education selected for the purpose of obtaining a credential authorized by the law operative, and the rules and regulations of the commission in effect on December 31, 1971.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 26.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44345.

The commission may deny any application for the issuance of a credential or for the renewal of a credential made by any applicant who falls under any of the following categories:

(a) Lacks the qualifications which are prescribed by law or regulations adopted by the commission pursuant thereto.

(b) Is physically or mentally so disabled as to be rendered unfit to perform the duties authorized by the credential for which he or she applies. However, the mere fact that an applicant has sought or received psychiatric treatment shall not be considered as preliminary evidence of mental disability and shall not provoke special scrutiny of such applicant’s qualifications for a credential.

(c) Is addicted to the use of intoxicating beverages to excess.

(d) Is addicted to the use of controlled substances.

(e) Has committed any act involving moral turpitude.

(f) Has had a certification document revoked.

(g) Has intentionally practiced or attempted to practice any material deception or fraud in his or her application.

(h) Fails or refuses to furnish reasonable evidence of identification or good moral character.

(i) Has been convicted of any offense defined in subdivision 1 of Section 314 of the Penal Code prior to September 7, 1955.

Any denial pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, shall be based upon reasons related to the applicant’s fitness to teach or fitness to perform other duties for which that applicant is certificated, or competence to perform the duties which the credential would authorize the applicant to perform.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1635, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

44346.

(a) The commission shall deny an application for the issuance of a credential or for the renewal of a credential made by any applicant who comes within any of the following classes:

(1) Has been determined to be a sexual psychopath under the provisions of former Article 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or under similar provisions of law of any other state.

(2) Has been convicted of a sex offense, as defined in Section 44010.

(3) Has been convicted of a controlled substance offense, as defined in Section 44011.

(4) Has been found to be insane through a criminal proceeding by a federal court or a court in this or any other state.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a), a person shall not be denied a credential solely on the basis that the person has been convicted of a crime specified in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) if the person has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code, and if probation has been terminated and the information or accusation has been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the commission shall deny the application of an applicant who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to
 either of the following:

(A) Section 290 of the Penal Code.

(B) A law of any other state or of the United States when the underlying offense, if committed or attempted in this state, would require registration as a sex offender under Section 290 of the Penal Code.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) or subdivision (b), the commission may issue a credential to a person convicted of a controlled substance offense, as defined in Section 44011, if the commission determines from the evidence presented that the person has been rehabilitated for at least five years, or has received a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code, or if the accusation or information against the person has
 been dismissed and the person has been released from all disabilities and penalties resulting from the offense pursuant to Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), a person shall not be denied a credential solely on the basis that they have been convicted of a crime specified in Section 11350 or 11377, or former Section 11500 or 11500.5, of the Health and Safety Code, if that conviction is more than five years old, and for which relief has been granted pursuant to Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.41, 1203.42, 1203.425, or 1203.49 of the Penal Code.

(d) Notwithstanding paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), the commission may issue a credential to a person found to be insane through a criminal proceeding by a federal court or a court in this or any other state if the commission determines from the evidence presented that the person has been
 rehabilitated for at least five years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 814, Sec. 2.   (SB 731)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

44346.1.

(a) The commission shall deny any application for the issuance of a credential made by an applicant who has been convicted of a violent or serious felony or a crime set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 44424 or whose employment has been denied or terminated pursuant to Section 44830.1.

(b) This section applies to any violent or serious offense which, if committed in this state, would have been punishable as a violent or serious felony.

(c) For purposes of this section, a violent felony is any felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code and a serious felony is any felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the commission may, but is not required to, grant a credential to an applicant who has been convicted of a violent or serious felony if the person is eligible for, and has obtained, a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 342, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

44346.5.

(a) The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of all individuals, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 49024, for the purposes of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal convictions and state or federal arrests and also information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the individual is free on bail or on his or her own recognizance pending trial or appeal.

(b) When received, the Department of Justice shall forward to the Federal Bureau of Investigation requests for
 federal summary criminal history information received pursuant to this section. The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and compile and disseminate a response to the commission.

(c) The Department of Justice shall provide a state and federal level response to the commission pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(d) The commission shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent arrest notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for individuals described in subdivision (a) of Section 49024 of this code.

(e) The Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the cost of processing the request described in this section.

(f) (1) If a denial of an application for a certificate is due at least in part to the individual’s state or federal criminal history record, the commission shall provide to the individual a copy of his or her criminal history record search response with the notice of the denial.

(2) The state or federal criminal history record search response shall not be modified or altered from its form or content as provided by the Department of Justice.

(3) The criminal history record search response shall be provided in such a manner as to protect the confidentiality and privacy of the individual’s criminal history record and the criminal history record search response shall not be made available by the commission to any school district or county office of education.

(4) The commission shall retain a copy of the individual’s criminal history record search response, and the date and the address to which it was sent. The commission shall make this information available upon request by the Department of Justice or the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 41.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

44346.6.

(a) Pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code, the commission shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of all commission employees, prospective employees, contractors, appointees pursuant to Section 44210, and volunteers.

(b) The Department of Justice shall provide a state- or federal-level response to the commission pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 831, Sec. 4.   (AB 2473)   Effective September 28, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

44347.

The terms of credentials shall be as specified in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44348.

Except as otherwise specifically required in this chapter, the commission shall establish regulations pertaining to the expiration dates of initially issued and renewed credentials.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44349.

Each credential issued by the commission shall clearly state the kind of service that it authorizes, the grades or classes, or the types of schools in which it authorizes service, and shall have such other content as the commission may prescribe or as may be prescribed by authority of the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44350.

(a) Each credential issued shall contain its date of expiration, be issued on a form prescribed by the commission, and bear the signatures of the executive director and the chair of the commission or their facsimile signatures.

(b) In order to ensure the timely processing of an application for a credential, either electronically or by printed copy, the commission shall process an application within 50 business days of receipt.

(c) A school district, county office of education, nonpublic school, charter school, or institution of higher education submitting an application for a credential, certificate, permit, or other document shall submit the application to the commission not more than three months after the issuance date of the document requested.

(d) The processing time set forth in subdivision (b) does not apply to an application subject to a fitness review by the commission pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 44240) of Chapter 2, or an application subject to a fitness review based on allegations of unfitness pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 44420) of Chapter 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 133, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

44351.

Whenever the date of expiration of any credential occurs while the person holding the credential is in the active military service of the United States of America or of the State of California, including active service in any uniformed auxiliary of, or to, any branch of such military service created or authorized as such auxiliary by the Congress of the United States of America or by the Legislature of the State of California or in the service of the United States Merchant Marine, or in the full-time paid service of the American Red Cross, during any national emergency declared by the President of the United States of America, or during a war in which the United States of America is engaged, or within six months after such person honorably leaves such service or has been placed on inactive duty, the credential is hereby continued in force until six months after such person honorably leaves such service or has been placed on inactive duty.

The holder of a credential so extended shall be entitled to a renewal of the credential prior to its date of expiration as herein fixed, subject to provisions of this code relating to the renewal of credentials.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44352.

Whenever satisfactory proof is presented to the commission by any person to whom the commission has granted a credential that has been lost or destroyed, the commission shall issue to him a new credential of the same kind, grade, character, and tenure as that lost or destroyed.

For issuance of the new credential the commission shall require a fee to cover the cost of replacement not to exceed the fee for issuance of an original credential pursuant to Section 44235. The revenues from the fee provided for in this section shall not be available for expenditure until appropriated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44353.

Satisfactory proof shall consist of an affidavit by the person, giving the kind of the credential, the date of issue, if possible, and the basis upon which it was issued, together with such other information as the issuing authority may require.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44354.

Any oath required of an applicant for a credential may be administered by any of the persons enumerated in Section 60, by such employees of the Department of Education as the Superintendent of Public Instruction may designate, and by such employee of the commission as the commission may designate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44355.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), all credentials regularly issued are valid until revoked, suspended, or expired as provided by law.

(b) A credential issued under either of the following circumstances is void and shall be deemed to be void from the date it was issued:

(1) A credential which would not have been issued but for a material deception or fraud committed by an applicant or by another in the applicant’s behalf; or 

(2) A credential which the commission had no lawful authority to issue and which would not have been issued but for some material mistake of law or fact by either or both the applicant and the commission.

(c) A notice that a credential is void pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) shall be served upon the credential holder at his or her last known address as provided in Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Within 30 days thereafter, such notice may be appealed to the commission only on the grounds that there was no fraud, material deception, or error and that the commission had the lawful authority to issue the credential on the facts stated in the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 488, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Penalties for the Submission of Fraudulent Documents [44360. - 44362.]

44360.

Any person is guilty of a misdemeanor who, individually or in a representative or any other capacity, does any of the following:

(a) Alters with fraudulent intent, or uses or attempts to use any altered diploma, certificate, transcript, affidavit, or any other evidence to be used in obtaining a credential or certificate authorizing service in the public schools.

(b) Assumes any degree or title not conferred upon him or her in the manner and by the authority recognized in this chapter with intent to represent falsely that he or she has received that degree or title, or who willfully makes any false statement on any application for examination, license, credential, or certificate under this chapter.

(c) Sells, barters, or offers to sell or barter, or purchase or procure directly or indirectly with the intent that it be fraudulently used, any license, credential, or permit authorizing service in the public schools, or any diploma, certificate, affidavit, transcript, or any other evidence required for use in connection with any application for, or the granting of any license, credential, or certificate authorizing service in, the public schools.

(d) Performs or attempts to perform any teaching or other certified service in any public school under a false or assumed name, or under any name other than that inscribed by the commission on any license, credential, or certificate authorizing him or her to perform those services. This provision shall not apply to persons who, because of marriage or other good faith reasons, have given notice of a name change.

(e) Refuses or willfully fails to surrender upon demand of the commission, his or her license, credential, or certificate authorizing teaching or service in the public schools upon revocation, suspension, or voiding of those documents under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 632, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

44361.

Every person filing for record or attempting to file for record the license, credential, or certificate issued to another person, falsely claiming himself or herself to be the person named in or entitled to the license, credential, or certificate, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be subject to imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 632, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

44362.

Every fact necessary to establish the qualifications of an applicant for the issuance of any license, credential, or certificate authorizing the performance of services in the public schools shall be verified under penalty of perjury. An oath to this effect shall be displayed prominently on each application form, and shall be dated and subscribed by the applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 632, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Accreditation in Educator Preparation [44370. - 44374.5.]

44370.

The Legislature finds and declares that the competence and performance of professional educators depends in part on the quality of their academic and professional preparation. The Legislature recognizes that standards of quality in collegiate preparation complement standards of candidate competence and performance, and that general standards and criteria regarding the overall quality of a candidate’s preparation are as essential as the assessment of the candidate’s competence and performance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

44371.

(a) The system for accreditation of educator preparation shall do all of the following:

(1) Concentrate on the overall quality of educator preparation in credential programs.

(2) Hold professional elementary, secondary, and postsecondary educators responsible for quality in the preparation of professional practitioners.

(3) Contribute to improvements in educator preparation and recognize excellence in preparation programs and institutions.

(4) Be governed by an accreditation framework that
 sets forth the policies of the commission regarding the accreditation of educator preparation.

(b) The accreditation framework shall do all of the following:

(1) Establish broad, flexible policies and standards for accreditation of educator preparation.

(2) Define the accreditation responsibilities, authority, and roles of the commission and the Committee on Accreditation.

(3) Establish an accreditation system that is efficient and cost effective.

(4) Require that accreditation decisions be based on sufficient, reliable evidence about the quality of educator preparation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 348, Sec. 7.   (SB 941)   Effective January 1, 2012.)